Utah statutes.
59-2-1711.   Tax list and duplicate.

The factual details to be shown on the assessor's tax list and duplicate with respect to land that is being valued, assessed, and taxed under this part are the same as those set forth by the assessor with respect to other taxable property in the county.



Enacted by Chapter 197, 2012 General Session

